test/src/morphology/N-taei31_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - täi: # Noun (31) täi 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     täi+N+Sg+Nom: täi
     täi+N+Sg+Gen: täi
     täi+N+Sg+Par: täid
     täi+N+Sg+Ill: [täihte, täihe]
     täi+N+Pl+Gen: täie
     täi+N+Pl+Par: täie
     täi+N+Pl+Ill: [täihte, täihe]
     täi+N+Pl+All: täele
